North Carolina, session 2025, SB308.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-84(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Permanent Registration Plates. – The Division may issue permanent plates for the
following motor vehicles:
…
(21) A motor vehicle that is owned and operated by a water and sewer authority
created under Article 1 of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S308-v-1*